Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-219
Incorporators.

(MBCA 2.01) One or more persons may act as
the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles
of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 19.